Utah statutes.
78B-15-503.   Requirements for genetic testing.
(1)  Genetic testing must be of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in
the field of genetic testing and performed in a testing laboratory accredited
by:
(a)  the American Association of Blood Banks, or a successor to its functions;
(b)  the American Society for Histocompatibility and Immunogenetics, or a
successor to its functions; or
(c)  an accrediting body designated by the federal Secretary of Health and
Human Services.
(2)  A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of one or more samples, or
a combination of samples, of blood, buccal cells, bone, hair, or other body
tissue or fluid.  The specimen used in the testing need not be of the same
kind for each individual undergoing genetic testing.
